Arkansas, session 2025, HB1728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-60-123. Findings — Students with disabilities.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The state does not collect or report statewide data to
examine the postsecondary outcomes for students with disabilities;
(2) The lack of information on postsecondary outcomes for
students with disabilities prevents the state from connecting students with
disabilities to the workforce; and
(3) In order to meet the economic demands of the state, it is
*CRH066*
04-01-2025 10:09:41 CRH066

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1728
essential to collect significant data and examine the postsecondary services,
supports, and accommodations necessary for students with disabilities to
improve postsecondary education and career outcomes.
(b)(1) An institution of higher education that is eligible to receive
Title IV federal student aid funds shall report annually to the Division of
Higher Education the number of students with disabilities at the institution
of higher education based upon the number of students with disabilities who
are registered to receive accommodations.
(2) The report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
include key data related to undergraduate students enrolled at the
institution of higher education who are formally registered as students with
disabilities with the office of disability services or an equivalent office
at the institution of higher education including without limitation the:
(A) Number of students registered to receive
accommodations;
(B) Percentage of students registered to receive
accommodations of all undergraduate students; and
(C) Total number of undergraduate certificates or degrees
awarded to students with disabilities who are registered to receive
accommodations.
(3) An institution of higher education is not required to submit
the information described in subdivision (b)(2) of this section if the:
(A) Number of students would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual student; or
(B) Total number of students with disabilities is less
than three percent (3%) of the total student population.
(c) The division shall include the number of students with
disabilities registered to receive accommodations included in the report
under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher
Education Annual Report required under § 6-60-703.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-60-703(b)(1), concerning the reports
required for the Comprehensive Arkansas Higher Education Annual Report, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(I) Students with disabilities, § 6-60-123;

04-01-2025 10:09:41 CRH066

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1728
/s/Ennett



































04-01-2025 10:09:41 CRH066